Wisconsin, session 2025, SB577.
do enact as follows:SB577,11Section 1. 20.505 (4) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB577,2,7220.505 (4) (d) Claims awards. A sum sufficient for payment of awards made 3by the claims board or department of administration under ss. 16.007, 775.05 (4), 4775.06 and 775.11, awards of financial assistance under s. 808.085, and awards 5made by an act of the legislature arising from a claim filed with the claims board 6which are not directed by law or under s. 16.007 (6m) to be paid from another 7appropriation.SB577,21Section 2. 20.515 (1) (ds) of the statutes is created to read:SB577,3,5220.515 (1) (ds) Payment of health insurance premiums for petitioners who 3receive compensation for wrongful imprisonment. A sum sufficient to pay the state’s 4share of premium costs for health care benefits and the cost of administering the 5benefits for petitioners under s. 40.516.SB577,36Section 3. 20.515 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB577,3,11720.515 (1) (g) Benefit and coverage payments; health care coverage for 8petitioners who receive compensation for wrongful imprisonment. All moneys 9received from petitioners under s. 40.516 who elect to be included in a health care 10coverage plan under s. 40.51 (6), for the payment of benefits and the cost of 11administering benefits for the petitioners.SB577,412Section 4. 40.51 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB577,3,161340.51 (1) The procedures and provisions pertaining to enrollment, premium 14transmitted and coverage of eligible employees and petitioners eligible for health 15care coverage under s. 40.516 for health care benefits shall be established by 16contract or rule except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter.SB577,517Section 5. 40.516 of the statutes is created to read:SB577,4,21840.516 Health care coverage for petitioners who receive 19compensation for wrongful imprisonment. (1) Any petitioner who receives 20compensation under s. 775.05 may elect coverage under any health care coverage 21plan offered under s. 40.51 (6). Coverage under this subsection shall continue for a 22period equal to the time he or she was imprisoned, but not to exceed 5 years. Any 23petitioner who receives compensation under s. 775.05 and who is eligible to obtain 1health care coverage offered by his or her employer or by the employer of his or her 2spouse cannot elect or continue coverage under this subsection.SB577,4,43(2) (a) Any petitioner who receives compensation under s. 775.05 and who 4elects coverage under sub. (1) shall jointly pay with the state all of the following:SB577,4,551. The full premium cost of health care coverage.SB577,4,662. The cost of administering the benefits under sub. (1).SB577,4,137(b) The amount that the petitioner is required to pay in health insurance 8premiums under par. (a) shall equal the amount required to be paid by state 9employees, as determined by the administrator of the division of personnel 10management in the department of administration under s. 40.05 (4) (ah). The 11remainder of the premium cost for health care coverage for petitioners who elect 12coverage under sub. (1) shall be paid from the appropriation account under s. 1320.515 (1) (ds).SB577,614Section 6. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB577,4,211571.05 (6) (b) 57. In the taxable year that relates to the year in which a 16payment is received, any amount received by an individual, or the individual’s 17estate, from the claims board under s. 775.05 (4), from the legislature under the 18process described in s. 775.05 (4), from the state as a result of the state’s payment of 19a petitioner’s premium costs under s. 40.516 (2) to the extent that the amount is 20recognized by the individual as income, or from a financial assistance award 21granted under s. 808.085.SB577,722Section 7. 227.03 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB577,5,223227.03 (5) This chapter does not apply to proceedings of the claims board, 24except as provided in ss. 775.05 (5), 775.06 (7) and 775.11 (2), and except that 1proceedings under s. 775.05 are subject to this chapter, unless otherwise provided 2in s. 775.05.SB577,83Section 8. 227.43 (1) (bw) of the statutes is created to read:SB577,5,54227.43 (1) (bw) Assign a hearing examiner to preside over each hearing 5conducted under s. 775.05.SB577,96Section 9. 301.051 of the statutes is created to read:SB577,5,107301.051 Wrongful imprisonment; transition plan. Not more than 5 days 8after a court issues an order for a plan requested by an inmate pursuant to s. 9808.085 (1) (a), the department shall create a transition-to-release plan for the 10inmate. The plan shall do all of the following:SB577,5,1511(1) Provide the inmate with a written list of community resources available to 12the inmate upon his or her release from prison, including temporary housing and 13emergency shelters, food banks, education and job assistance, and health care 14services in the county into which the inmate will be released. The department shall 15maintain up−to−date lists with contact information for each county in the state.SB577,5,1816(2) Provide the inmate with an individual counseling session with a person 17trained by the department or the county into which the inmate will be released to 18assist inmates in the transition to release from prison.SB577,5,2119(3) Schedule an appointment, set for not later than 2 weeks after the inmate’s 20date of release, for the inmate to meet with a social worker or aid program 21administrator for the county into which the inmate will be released.SB577,1022Section 10. 775.05 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 775.05 (2) (a) and 23amended to read:SB577,6,824775.05 (2) (a) Any Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), any person who is 1imprisoned as the result of his or her conviction for a crime in any court of this 2state, of which crime the person claims to be innocent, and who is released from 3imprisonment for that crime after March 13, 1980, may petition the claims board 4for compensation for such imprisonment. Upon receipt of the Within 5 days after 5the claims board receives a petition, the claims board department of administration 6shall transmit a copy thereof to the prosecutor who prosecuted the petitioner and 7the judge who sentenced the petitioner for the conviction which is the subject of the 8claim, or their successors in office, for the information of these persons.SB577,119Section 11. 775.05 (2) (b) and (c) of the statutes are created to read:SB577,6,1410775.05 (2) (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a person who is imprisoned as 11the result of his or her conviction for a felony in any court of this state arising from 12the same course of conduct that resulted in conviction for the crime of which the 13person claims to be innocent if the person does not claim to be innocent of that 14felony.SB577,6,1815(c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a person who is convicted of a violent crime 16specified in s. 939.632 (1) (e) 1. or 2. after his or her release from imprisonment. A 17person who is ineligible to petition for compensation under this paragraph is also 18ineligible to receive any award of compensation that has not been paid.SB577,1219Section 12. 775.05 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB577,6,2020775.05 (2m) (a) In this subsection:SB577,6,22211. “Decedent” means a deceased person who had the right to petition the 22claims board for compensation under sub. (2) at the time of his or her death. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb577 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb577 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB577 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB577 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB577: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting